Washington statutes.
RCW 37.12.170

Limits on retrocession under RCW 37.12.160.

A civil or criminal retrocession accomplished pursuant to the procedure set forth in RCW 37.12.160 does not:

(1) Affect the state's civil jurisdiction over the civil commitment of sexually violent predators pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW and the state must retain such jurisdiction notwithstanding the completion of the retrocession process authorized under RCW 37.12.160; and

(2) Abate any action or proceeding which has been filed with any court or agency of the state or local government preceding the effective date of the completion of a retrocession authorized under RCW 37.12.160.

[ 2012 c 48 s 2.]